Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.221

Mortgage loan originator—License required—Unique identifier required.

An individual defined as a mortgage loan originator must not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license under this chapter. Each licensed mortgage loan originator must register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the nationwide mortgage licensing system.

[ 2015 c 229 s 31; 2013 c 29 s 9; 2009 c 120 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.